Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER 89

COLLECTIVE
BARGAINING IN PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT

Section

89-1 Statement of findings and policy

89-2 Definitions

89-3 Rights of employees

89-3.5 Religious exemption from support of
employee

organization

89-4 Payroll deductions

89-5 Hawaii labor relations board

89-5.1 Hearing notice

89-6 Appropriate bargaining units

89-7 Elections

89-8 Recognition and representation; employee

participation

89-8.5 Negotiating authority; Hawaii health systems

corporation

89-9 Scope of negotiations; consultation

89-10 Written agreements; enforceability; cost
items

89-10.5 Collective bargaining and local school
initiatives

89-10.55 Charter school collective bargaining;
bargaining

unit; employer; exclusive representative

89-10.6 Schools; waiver of policies, rules, or
procedures

89-10.8 Resolution of disputes; grievances

89-11 Resolution of disputes; impasses

89-12 Strikes, rights and prohibitions

89-13 Prohibited practices; evidence of bad
faith

89-14 Prevention of prohibited practices

89-15 Financial reports to employees

89-16 Public records and proceedings

89-16.5 Access to personal records by an employee

organization

89-16.6 Disclosure to an exclusive representative

89-17 List of employee organizations and
exclusive

representatives

89-18 Penalty

89-19 Chapter takes precedence, when

89-20 Chapter inoperative, when

89-23 Classroom cleaning; exception

Rules of Court

Applicability of Hawaii Rules of Civil Procedure, see HRCP
rule 81(b)(12).

Case Notes

Chapter 92F not a "conflicting statute on the same
subject matter" as this chapter, within the meaning of §89-19, and thus is
not preempted by this chapter or any collective bargaining agreement negotiated
under it. 83 H. 378, 927 P.2d 386.

Under this chapter, a public employee pursuing an individual
grievance exhausts his or her administrative remedies when the employee
completes every step available to the employee in the grievance process and a
request to the employee's exclusive bargaining representative to proceed to the
last grievance step, which only the representative can undertake, would be
futile. 97 H. 528, 40 P.3d 930.

The Act 355, L 1997 amendment to §78-13, which essentially
altered the dates when public employees are to be paid, did not violate article
XIII, §2 of the Hawaii constitution nor this chapter inasmuch as they did not
prohibit a state employer from changing the pay dates of its employees; thus,
the Act 355 amendment was not unconstitutional. 111 H. 168, 140 P.3d 401.

As §84-13 prohibited the posting of campaign materials on a
union bulletin board on the fourth floor of a state building, and nothing in
this chapter was explicitly contrary to, or inconsistent with, that
construction, there was no conflict between §84-13 and §89-3. 116 H. 73, 170
P.3d 324.

The Hawaii labor relations board (HLRB) had exclusive
original jurisdiction over the statutory issues raised in public employees'
union's complaint, and the circuit court erred in addressing the constitutional
issues without first giving the HLRB the opportunity to address the issues
arising under this chapter. 124 H. 197, 239 P.3d 1.

Circuit court erred by failing to allow the Hawaii labor
relations board to decide the issues relating to this chapter before deciding
the constitutional issues in the case where the plain language of §89-14
supported the conclusion that the board had exclusive original jurisdiction
over the plaintiffs' claims and that the case was a "controversy
concerning prohibited practices" that must first be submitted to the
board. 126 H. 318, 271 P.3d 613.

Granting the labor relations board exclusive original
jurisdiction over plaintiff's action under §89-14 did not violate plaintiff's
equal protection right; as plaintiff's fundamental right was not implicated,
and plaintiff did not argue that public employees were a suspect class, the
board's exclusive original jurisdiction over public sector prohibited practice
controversies was rationally related to the public policy of this chapter. 125
H. 317 (App.), 260 P.3d 1135.

Granting the labor relations board exclusive original
jurisdiction over plaintiff's action under §89-14 did not violate plaintiff's substantive
due process rights; as plaintiff's fundamental right was not implicated,
granting the board exclusive original jurisdiction over public sector
prohibited practice controversies was rationally related to the public policy
of this chapter - that it would be more effective in promoting harmonious
governmental employer-employee relations and assuring the effective operation
of government for these controversies to be first decided by the board rather
than the courts. 125 H. 317 (App.), 260 P.3d 1135.

Section 89-14, by vesting the labor relations board with
exclusive original jurisdiction over plaintiff's action, did not violate the
First Amendment of the U.S. Constitution, as the administrative dispute
resolution process set forth in this chapter did not preclude plaintiff from
seeking redress from the courts; plaintiff could appeal an unfavorable decision
issued by the board to the circuit court and was thus not deprived of
reasonable access to the courts. 125 H. 317 (App.), 260 P.3d 1135.

Section 89-14 did not violate plaintiff's procedural due
process rights where: (1) this chapter afforded plaintiff the opportunity to
present plaintiff's action to the labor relations board in an administrative
hearing; (2) the decision of the board required a majority vote of its three
members, and one member each must be representative of management, labor, and
the public; and (3) any person aggrieved by a decision of the board could
appeal that decision to the circuit court. 125 H. 317 (App.), 260 P.3d 1135.

To the extent that there may be a conflict between the
jurisdictional provisions of this chapter and chapter 658A, this chapter takes
precedence over chapter 658A. 132 H. 492 (App.), 323 P.3d 136 (2014).

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next